South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5535.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 25, Title 4 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 4-25-80. All newly constructed multi-family dwellings permitted to be built after July 1, 2026, must install fire sprinkler systems. SECTION 2.  Article 3, Chapter 25, Title 4 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 4-25-290.  All newly constructed multi-family dwellings permitted to be built after July 1, 2026, must install fire sprinkler systems. SECTION 3.  Article 7, Chapter 25, Title 5 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 5-25-950.  All newly constructed multi-family dwellings permitted to be built after July 1, 2026, must install fire sprinkler systems. SECTION 4.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-9-165.  The State Fire Marshall must promulgate regulations to specify the appropriate type of fire sprinkler system for installation in multi-family dwellings as required by this act. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----